Wisconsin, session 2025, AB997.
do enact as follows:AB997,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.AB997,2,24(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 5of financial institutions under s. 20.144 (1) (g), the dollar amount for fiscal year 62025-26 is increased by $60,000,000 and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is 1increased by $60,000,000 for payments by the department to Trump accounts if the 2department’s contributions to Trump accounts are expressly authorized by statute.AB997,2,33